lexd_components/hye-verbs_irreg.lexd
############
########Irregulars and defective verbs
### Removing suppletive groups or few-lemma groups, and just keeping them inside the paradigm file
#####Groupable irregular verbs


LEXICON VerbRootBarnalHyePres(2)
բառնալ:բառ <tv>
համբառնալ:համբառ <iv>
վերամբառնալ:վերամբառ <tv>
LEXICON VerbRootBarnalHyePast(2)
բառնալ:բարձ <tv>
համբառնալ:համբարձ <iv>
վերամբառնալ:վերամբարձ <tv>


LEXICON VerbRootCelHye(2) # Class 26
փակչել:փակ <iv>
կափչել:կափ <iv>
փախչել:փախ <iv>
դռնչել:դռն <iv>
դպչել:դպ <iv>
դիպչել:դիպ <iv>
կպչել:կպ <iv>
թռչել:թռ <iv>
հանգչել:հանգ <iv> # Dir/LR
կիսահանգչել:կիսահանգ  <iv> # Dir/LR
սառչել:սառ <iv> # Dir/LR
ուռչել:ուռ  <iv># Dir/LR
արտաթռչել:արտաթռ <iv>
կորչել:կոր <iv>
դնդչել:դնդ <iv>


# Most of these irregulars have derivatives that are likely regularized
# Just to be safe I make the irregular form be secondary
LEXICON VerbRootHitStop(2)
զարկել:զարկ <tv> # had to redundantly add this so that this lexicon isnt empty
համազարկել:համազարկ <tv> # Dir/LR
թևազարկել:թևազարկ <iv> # Dir/LR

LEXICON VerbRootTake(2)
թևառնել:թևառ <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootNelNale(2) # Class 23 24
հագնել:հագ <tv>
հասնել:հաս <iv>
կալնել:կալ  <tv> 
էլնել:էլ <iv>
ընգնել:ընգ <iv>
հեծնել:հեծ  <tv> # Dir/LR
վերաբուսնել:վերաբուսն <tv> # Dir/LR
ընգնել:ընգ  <iv>
քթնել:քթ <tv>
փախնել:փախ  <iv>
պրծնել:պրծ <iv>
համընկնել:համընկ <iv>
էղնել:էղ <iv>
կպնել:կպ <iv>
թռնել:թռ <iv>
բուսնել:բուս <iv> # Dir/LR
հատնել:հատ <iv>
վերագտնել:վերագտ <tv>
մտնել:մտ <iv>

LEXICON VerbRootPutPres(2)
դնել:դն <tv>
կանոնադնել:կանոնադն <tv>
ծնրադնել:ծնրադն <iv>
առդնել:առդն <tv>
ներդնել:ներդն <tv>
LEXICON VerbRootPutPast(2)
դնել:դր <tv>
կանոնադնել:կանոնադր <tv>
ծնրադնել:ծնրադր <iv>
առդնել:առդր <tv>
ներդնել:ներդր <tv>
LEXICON VerbRootPutImpSg(2)
դնել:դ <tv>
կանոնադնել:կանոնադ  <tv>
ծնրադնել:ծնրադ <iv>
առդնել:առդ <tv>
ներդնել:ներդ <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootSeeE(2) #Incorrectly part of գտնել group but it has bare imperative 2sg like առնել
տեսնել:տես <tv>
նախատեսնել:նախատես <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootEatPres(2) # Class 57 ուտել կերայ
կիսաուտել:կիսաուտ <tv>
LEXICON VerbRootEatPast(2)
կիսաուտել:կիսակեր <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootE(2) 
կիսաուտել:կիսաուտ <tv> # Dir/LR
համազարկել:համազարկ <tv> 
թևազարկել:թևազարկ <iv>
վերաբուսնել:վերաբուսն <tv>
կանոնադնել:կանոնադն <tv> # Dir/LR
ծնրադնել:ծնրադն <iv> # Dir/LR
առդնել:առդն <tv> # Dir/LR
ներդնել:ներդն <tv> # Dir/LR
թևառնել:թևառն <tv> # Dir/LR
փլչել:փլչ <iv> # Dir/LR
կափչել:կափ <iv> # Dir/LR
